District of Columbia statutes.
26-310

Display of license.

A license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee or, in the case of a mobile unit, upon the mobile unit.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 11, 45 DCR 1782

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1110.